North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4.1 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4.1-18 Industrial Hemp [Repealed]

4.1-18-01.
Industrial hemp (cannabis sativa I.) — Oilseed.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 61, § 4, effective March 29, 2019.

4.1-18-02.
Industrial hemp —Licensure — Reporting requirements — Continuing appropriation.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 61, § 4, effective March 29, 2019.

4.1-18-03.
Industrial hemp seed — Authorized activity — Research.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 61, § 4, effective March 29, 2019.